Louisiana, session 2026, SB229.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College and the commissioner of administration,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, are hereby authorized and
empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver any interest, excluding mineral
rights, the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College and the commissioner of administration may have to all or any
portion of the following described parcels of property in Bossier Parish:
Alden Plantation in Bossier Parish, Louisiana, described as Sections 17,
18, 19, 20 and 21 in Township 18 North, Range 12 West, Bossier Parish,
Louisiana, more particularly described as follows:
The Southeast Quarter; the South half of the Northeast Quarter lying
South of the North Right of Way line of U.S. Highway 80; and the West
Half lying South of the North Right of Way line of U.S. Highway 80, all
in Section 17; and
All of Section 18 lying South of the centerline of U.S. Highway 80; and
A tract located in Sections 18 and 19, described as follows: begin at a
point in the Southwest Quarter of Section IR, which point is 2014.94 feet
North and 181.00 feet East of the Southwest corner of Section 19; run
thence North parallel to the West Section line of Section 19, to a point on
a line located 30.00 feet South of the center line of Old Dixie Overland
Highway as the said highway existed on March 4, 1918; run thence
Page 1 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
northeasterly on the line located 30.00 feet South of the center line of the
Old Dixie Overland Highway as it existed on March 4, 1918, to the East
section line of Section 18; run thence South on the East section line of
Sections 18 and IR to the point where the East section line of Section 19
intersects the north right of way line of the V.S.&P. Railroad; run thence
southwesterly along the North right of way line of the V.S.&. P. Railroad
to a point located 502.20 feet West of Mile Post No. 162 on the V.S.& P.
Railroad, which point is also located 2109.95 feet East and 680.17 feet
North of the Southwest corner of Section 19; run thence North a distance
of 2730.07 feet along a line parallel to the West section line of Section 19
to a point in the center of Alligator Bayou; run thence South 87 degrees
22 minutes West 210.90 feet; run thence South 58 degrees 15 minutes
West 350.00 feet; run thence North 74 degrees 30 minutes West 469.26
feet to a point on the center line of Alligator Bayou; run thence South
965.40 feet on a line parallel to the West section line of Section 19, to a
concrete monument; and run thence South 69 degrees 35 minutes West
1033.30 feet to the point of beginning; and
All of Section 20 lying North of the North right of way line of the V.S. &
P. Railroad Company; and
All of Section 21 lying South and West of Red Chute Bayou, to the
centerline of said Bayou, and North of the North right of way line of the
V.S. & P. Railroad; and all that part of the Northwest Quarter of Section
21 lying North and East of Red Chute Bayou, to the centerline of said
Bayou, less the North 431.00 feet thereof; and the Northwest Quarter of
the northeast Quarter of Section 21, less two (2.00) acres in the
Southwest corner sold by A. M. O'Neal to Red Chute Baptist Church of
Bossier, by deed dated January 7, 1921, recorded in Book 55, page 257,
records of Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
Being the same property described in that certain Credit Sale Deed,
dated July 31, 1958, by and between Roger E. Wheless, as Vendor, and
Page 2 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
Emmett R. Hook, et al, as Vendee, and being recorded at Conveyance
Book 286, Page 619, of the records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish,
Louisiana.
LESS & EXCEPT THE FOLLOWING DESCRIBED TRACTS:
(1) That certain four-acre tract of land in Section 19, Township 18
North, Range 12 West, Bossier Parish, Louisiana, more fully described
as follows: Beginning at the Southwest corner of said Section 19, run
thence North along the West line of said section a distance of 4579.22 feet
to a point on the South right of way line of U.S. Highway 80; run thence
North 69 degrees 34 minutes East along U.S. Highway 80 a distance of
41830 feet to an iron pipe set in the East high bank of Alligator Bayou,
the point of beginning of tract herein described; continue thence North
69 degrees 34 minutes East along U.S. Highway 80 a distance of 320.00
feet; run thence South 20 degrees 26 minutes East a distance of 391.25
feet; run thence South 69 degrees 34 minutes West a distance of 692.60
feet; run thence North a distance of 730 feet to a point in the East high
bank of said Alligator Bayou; turn thence North 42 degrees 34 minutes
East a distance of 239.00 feet; run thence North 17 degrees 09 minutes
a distance of 162.80 feet; run thence North 01 degrees 03 minutes East
a distance of 157.10 feet to the point of beginning, containing 4.00 acres,
more or less, and being the same property described in that certain Cash
Sale Deed dated June 18, 1964, by and between Emmett IL Hook, et al,
as Vendor and Lacy Trailer Manufacturing Co., Inc., as Vendee, and
recorded at Conveyance Book 387, Page 583, of the records of the Clerk
of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(2) Those certain rights of way for Interstate 20 and Interstate 220
expropriated by the Louisiana Department of Highways, and being more
fully described in that certain Order of Expropriation dated May 26,
1971, and being recorded at Conveyance Book 471, Page 217, of the
records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
Page 3 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
(3) A parcel of land in Section 20, more fully described as follows: From
the Northeast corner of said Section 20 run South 00 degrees 27 minutes
54 seconds West 41.54 feet; run thence North 84 degrees 44 minutes 50
seconds East 405.77 feet; thence North 00 degrees 31 minutes 41 seconds
West 150.00 feet to a point on the centerline of 1-20, being the P.T. curve,
said curve having an angle of 16 degrees 21 minutes 28 seconds, Tangent
1097.99 feet, radius 7639.44 feet; run thence westerly along the arc of
said curve, being the centerline of said 1-20, 2181.04 feet to the P.C. of
said curve; thence South 15 degrees 58 minutes 39 seconds East 150.00
feet; thence South 65 degrees 26 minutes 14 seconds West 623.75 feet;
thence South 24 degrees 33 minutes 46 seconds East 50.00 feet to the
point of beginning of the tract herein described; run thence South 65
degrees 26 minutes 14 seconds West 413.50 feet; thence South 29 degrees
16 minutes 57 seconds West 440.90 feet; thence South 00 degrees 03
minutes 39 seconds West 399.70 feet; thence South 17 degrees 01 minutes
46 seconds East 182.60 feet; thence North 82 degrees 59 minutes 24
seconds East 482.60 feet; thence North 59 degrees 08 minutes 24 seconds
East 201.90 feet; thence North 49 degrees 04 minutes 54 seconds East
250.25 feet; thence North 40 degrees 13 minutes 44 seconds East 64.60
feet; thence North 24 degrees 33 minutes 46 seconds West 828.60 feet to
the point of beginning, containing 1630 acres, more or less.
A parcel of land in Section 19; more fully described as follows: From a
2-inch iron pipe marking the Southwest corner of said Section 19, run
North 00 degrees 31 minutes 22 seconds East a distance of 413.81 feet to
the centerline of the LC. Railroad; run thence North 85 degrees 22
minutes 09 seconds East 182.00 feet; thence north 00 degrees, 31 minutes
22 seconds East 1991.91 feet to a point on the South right of way line of
Interstate 20; thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East 329.10
feet; thence North 72 degrees I S minutes 48 seconds East 300.17 feet;
thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds 1450.00 feet; thence
Page 4 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
North 15 degrees 49 minutes 39 seconds West 20.00 feet; thence North
74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East 566.67 feet (the preceding five
courses being along the south right of way line of Interstate 20); thence
South 38 degrees 49 minutes 40 seconds East 637.05 feet; thence South
23 degrees 29 minutes 40 seconds East 260.00 feet; thence South 07
degrees 09 minutes 40 seconds East 625.00 feet; thence South 08 degrees
20 minutes 20 seconds West 539.70 feet; thence South 21 degrees 09
minutes 40 seconds East 49.10 feet to the point of beginning of the tract
herein described; run thence South 21 degrees 09 minutes 40 seconds
East 187.60 feet; thence South 57 degrees 50 minutes 40 seconds East
408.90 feet; thence North 86 degrees 32 minutes 50 seconds East 329.25
feet; thence North 79 degrees 42 minutes 50 seconds East; 244.25 feet;
thence South 71 degrees 57 minutes 10 seconds East 164.20 feet (the
preceding ten courses being along the centerline of Alligator Bayou);
thence North 14 degrees 04 minutes 30 seconds East 170.83 feet; thence
North 46 degrees 54 minutes 50 seconds East 292.11 feet; thence North
61 degrees 34 minutes 20 seconds East 236.34 feet; thence North 47
degrees 32 minutes East 191.67 feet; thence North 18 degrees 59 minutes
East 163.67 feet; thence, North 01 degrees 37 minutes 40 seconds West
217.40 feet; thence North 16 degrees 02 minutes 30 seconds West 154.04
feet; thence North 34 degrees 21 minutes West 300.00 feet (the preceding
eight courses being along the centerline of Flat River) run thence South
57 degrees 50 minutes 40 seconds West 1865.41 feet to the point of
beginning, containing 30.50 acres, more or less.
The two above described tracts being the same property described in
that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated April 20, 1972, by and between
Emmett R. Hook, et al, as Vendor, and Southern Paving Corporation,
as Vendee, and being recorded at Conveyance Book 483, Page 632, of the
records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(4) A parcel of land located in Section 19, more fully described as
Page 5 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
follows: From a 2-inch iron pipe marking the Southwest corner of said
Section 19, run North 00 degrees 31 minutes 22 seconds East a distance
of 413.81 feet to the centerline of I.C. Railroad; thence North 85 degrees
22 minutes 09 seconds East 182.00 feet; thence North 00 degrees 31
minutes 22 seconds East 1991.91 feet to a point on the south right of way
line of Interstate 20; thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East
329.21 feet; thence North 72 degrees 15 minutes 48 seconds East 300.17
feet; thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East 1450.00 feet;
thence North 15 degrees 49 minutes 39 seconds West 20.00 feet; thence
North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East 566.67 feet (the preceding
five courses being along the south right of way line of Interstate 20); run
thence South 38 degrees 49 minutes 40 seconds East 637.05 feet; thence
South 23 degrees 29 minutes 40 seconds East 260.00 feet; thence South
07 degrees 09 minutes 40 seconds East 625.00 feet; thence South 08
degrees 20 minutes 20 seconds West 103.00 feet to the point of beginning
of the tract herein described (the preceding four courses being along the
centerline of Alligator Bayou); run thence South 08 degrees 20 minutes
20 seconds West 436.70 feet; thence South 21 degrees 09 minutes 40
seconds East 49.10 feet (the preceding two courses being along the
centerline of Alligator Bayou); run thence North 57 degrees 50 minutes
40 seconds East 1865.41 feet; thence North 34 degrees 21 minutes, West
134.92 feet; thence North 38 degrees 34 minutes 10 seconds West 247.00
feet (the preceding two courses being along the centerline of Flat River);
run thence South 57 degrees 50 minutes 40 seconds West 1539.70 feet to
the point of beginning, containing 15.00 acres, more or less, and being
the same property described in that certain Cash Sale Deed dated
October 2, 1972, by and between Emmett R. Hook. et al, as Vendor and
Southern Paving Corporation, as Vendee, and being recorded at
Conveyance Book 493, Page 96, of the records of the Clerk of Court,
Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
Page 6 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
(5) A tract of land containing 302.075 acres, more or less, located in
Section 17, being more fully described as follows: From the common
corner of Sections 16, 17, 20 and 21, run North 00 degrees 30 minutes 45
seconds East along the line common to Sections 16 and 17, a distance of
353.32 feet to the point of intersection with the North right of way line
of Interstate 20 and being the point of beginning of the tract herein
described; said point being in a curve to the left; thence traversing said
North right of way line of Interstate 20 and Interstate 220, run
southwesterly along said curve to the left a distance of 314.50 feet; run
thence South 85 degrees 15 minutes 03 seconds West a distance of
1050.43 feet; run thence South 79 degrees 42 minutes 56 seconds West
a distance of 768.32 feet; run thence North 74 degrees 04 minutes 50
seconds West a distance of 940.76 feet; run thence North 57 degrees 02
minutes 52 seconds, West a distance of 469.84 feet; run thence North 42
degrees I0 minutes 16 seconds West a distance of 438.63 feet; run thence
North 17 degrees 58 minutes 00 seconds West a distance of 1430.52 feet
to the point of intersection with the South right of way line of U.S.
Highway 80; run thence North 47 degrees 16 minutes 27 seconds East
along said South right of way line of U.S. Highway 80 a distance of
1098.28 feet; run thence North 52 degrees 59 minutes 27 seconds East a
distance of 502.49 feet; run thence North 47 degrees 16 minutes 26
seconds East a distance of 200.00 feet; run thence North 41 degrees 33
minutes 26 seconds a distance of 502.49 feet; run thence North 47
degrees 16 minutes 27 seconds East a distance of 188.77 feet; run thence
South 89 degrees 44 minutes 13 seconds East a distance of 2358.28 feet
to the point of intersection with the East line of Section 17; run thence
South 00 degrees 30 minutes 45 seconds West along said East line of
Section 17, a distance of 3632.31 feet to the point of beginning,
containing 302.075 acres, more or less, and being the same property
described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated April 5, 1973, by and
Page 7 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
between Emmett R. Hook, et al, as Vendor, and Louisiana Downs, Inc,
as Vendee, and being recorded in Conveyance book 499, Page 74, of the
records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(6) A tract of land containing 40.00 acres, more or less, located in
Sections 17, 18, 19 and 20, more particularly described as follows: From
the Southwest corner of Section 19, run North 00 degrees 30 minutes 13
seconds, West, along the West line of Section 19 a distance of 413.81 feet
to the point of intersection with the centerline of the Illinois Central
Railroad main line; run thence South 85 degrees 22 minutes 09 seconds
East along said centerline of the Illinois Central Railroad main line a
distance of 182.00 feet; run thence North 00 degrees 30 minutes 13
seconds East a distance of 2335.08 feet to the point of intersection with
the North right of way line of Interstate 20; thence traversing said North
right of way line of interstate 20, run North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21
seconds East a distance of 1009.18 feet; run thence North 00 degrees 31
minutes 51 seconds East a distance of 292.65 feet; run thence South 7.1
degrees 58 minutes 09 seconds East a distance of 469.26 feet; run thence
North 65 degrees 36 minutes 33 seconds East a distance of 570.64 feet;
run thence South 00 degrees 32 minutes 41 seconds West a distance of
123.08 feet; run thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East a
distance of 1962.64 feet; run thence North 15 degrees 49 minutes 39
seconds West a distance of 50.00 feet; run thence North 74 degrees 10
minutes 21 seconds East a distance of 1150.00 feet; run thence North 67
degrees 56 minutes 48 seconds East a distance of 309.65 feet to the point
of beginning of the tract herein described; run thence North 15 degrees
49 minutes 39 seconds West a distance of 1462.35 feet to the point of
intersection with the centerline of Musselshell bayou; run thence North
71 degrees 04 minutes 21 seconds East along said centerline of
Musselshell Bayou a distance of 184.68 feet; run thence, North 83
degrees 44 minutes 20 seconds East a distance of 293.81 feet; run thence
Page 8 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
North 49 degrees 08 minutes 53 seconds East a distance of 858.09 feet;
run thence North 39 degrees 29 minutes 17 seconds West a distance of
595.30 feet to the point of intersection with the South right of way line
of U.S. Highway 80, said point being in a curve to the left having a radius
of 3063.88 feet; run thence northeasterly, along said curve to the left a
distance of 63.83 feet; run thence North 47 degrees 16 minutes 27
seconds East a distance of 306.62 feet to the point of intersection with the
West right of way line of Interstate 220; thence traversing said West
right of way line of Interstate 20 and Interstate 20, run South 17 degrees
58 minutes 00 seconds East a distance of 1250.11 feet; run thence South
03 degrees 51 minutes 29 seconds West a distance of 215.41 feet; run
thence South 26 degrees 03 minutes 42 seconds West a distance of
1236.15 feet; run thence South 52 degrees 22 minutes 16 seconds West
a distance of 269.26 feet; run thence South 67 degrees 36 minutes 48
seconds West a distance of 243.61 feet to the point of beginning,
containing 40.00 acres, more or less, and being the same property
described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated April 5, 1973, by and
between Emmett R. Hook, et al, as Vendor, and John F. Wolcott, as
Vendee, being recorded at Conveyance Book 499, Page 60, of the records
of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(7) A tract of land located in Section 19, more fully described as follows:
From a monument marking the, Southwest corner of said Section 19,
run North 00 degrees 31 minutes 22 seconds East a distance of 413.81
feet to a point in the centerline of the Illinois Central Railroad, run
thence North 85 degrees 22 minutes 09 seconds East a distance of 182.00
feet; run thence North 00 degrees 31 minutes 22 seconds East a distance
of 1585.12 feet to a concrete monument, being the point of the beginning
of the tract herein described; run thence North 00 degrees 31 minutes 22
seconds East a distance of 406.79 feet to a point in the south right of way
line of Interstate 20, run thence North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds
Page 9 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
East a distance of 329.21 feet, run thence North 72 degrees 15 minutes
48 seconds East a distance of 300.17 feet, run thence North 74 degrees 10
minutes 21 seconds East a distance of 382.86 feet (the preceding three
courses being along the south line of said Interstate 20), run thence
South 00 degrees 31 minutes 51 seconds West a distance of 339.69 feet to
a concrete monument; run thence South 70 degrees 02 minutes 41
seconds West a distance of 1033.58 feet to the point of beginning,
containing 8.30 acres, more or less, and being the same property
described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated March 3, 1978, by and
between Emmett R. Hook, et al, as Vendor, and Bryan Ardis Frame, et
al, as Vendee, and being recorded at Conveyance Book 603, Page 82, of
the records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(8) A tract located in Section 21, more fully described as follows:
Begin at an existing iron pin at the Northeast corner of Section 21;
Township 18 North, Range 12 West, Bossier Parish, Louisiana, and run
West 13215 feet to a set A" iron rod for the point of beginning; thence
run South 0 degrees 25 minutes 07 seconds East 1320.04 feet to a set 5/8"
iron rod; thence run West 1070.50 feet to a set 5/8" iron rod; thence run
North 0 degrees 25 minutes 07 seconds West 333 feet to A set 5/8" iron
rod; thence, run West 252 feet to a set 5/8" iron rod; thence run South
0 degrees 25 minutes 07 seconds East 2104.82 feet to a set 5/8" iron rod
on the top bank of Red Chute Bayou; thence run along the top bank of
Red Chute Bayou for the next eighteen (18) calls; thence run North 44
degrees 49 minutes 18 seconds West 335.30 feet; thence run North 26
degrees 48 minutes 24 seconds West 62.57 feet; thence run North 25
degrees 22 minutes 00 seconds West 657.73 feet; thence run North 38
degrees 26 minutes 02 seconds West 360.94 feet; thence run North 23
degrees 58 minutes 18 seconds West 52.23 feet; thence run North 11
degrees 36 minutes 06 seconds West 55.0 feet; thence run North 21
degrees 30 minutes 40 seconds West 220.47 feet; thence run North 38
Page 10 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
degrees 44 minutes 17 seconds West 389.80 feet; thence run North 29
degrees 24 minutes 44 seconds West 491.77 feet; thence run North 83
degrees 11 minutes 58 seconds West 56630 feet; thence run North 74
degrees 23 minutes 09 seconds West 52.92 feet; thence run North 88
degrees 00 minutes 10 seconds West 230.23 feet; thence run South 80
degrees 40 minutes 38 seconds West 93.72 feet; thence run, South 87
degrees 56 minutes 56 seconds West 45.14 feet; thence run North 61
degrees, 39 minutes 52 seconds West 155.57 feet; thence run North 40
degrees 06 minutes 37 seconds West 563.50 feet; thence run North 34
degrees 49 minutes 10 seconds West 160.51 feet; thence run North 8
degrees 57 minutes 57 seconds West 149.26 feet to a set 5/8" iron rod on
the South right-of-way of Interstate 20; thence run South 89 degrees 02
minutes 47 seconds East 300.31 feet along said right-of-way to a set A"
iron rod at the intersection of said right-of-way and the West line of
Section 21; thence run South 0 degrees 25 minutes 07 seconds east 381
feet to a set 518" iron rod; thence run cast 2645 feet to a set 5/V iron rod;
thence run North 0 degrees 25 minutes 07 seconds West 431 feet to an
existing iron pin; thence run East 1322.5 feet to the point of beginning,
containing 122.00 acres, more or less, and being the same property
described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated October 28, 1998, by and
between JPIL Beaird Partnership, et al, as Vendor, and Newt Brown
Contractor, Inc., as Vendee, being recorded on December 21, 1998, at
Conveyance Book 1172, Page 371, of the records of the Clerk of Court,
Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(9) A tract of land located in Sections 18 & 19, Township 18 North,
Range 12 West; Bossier City, Bossier Parish, Louisiana, being more fully
described as follows: Beginning at the Southwest corner of said Section
19, run thence North 00 degrees 28 minutes 08 seconds East a distance
of 2766.05 feet; run thence South 89 degrees 31 minutes 52 seconds East
a distance of 181.00 feet to the point of beginning of tract herein
Page 11 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
described, said point also located on the northerly right of way line of
Interstate 20; thence leaving said northerly right of way line run North
00 degrees 28 minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 783.42 feet; run
thence North 69 degrees 59 minutes; 16 seconds East a distance of
1365.87 feet; run thence North 20 degrees 00 minutes 17 seconds West
a distance of 692.19 feet; run thence North 69 degrees 57 minutes 04
seconds East a distance of 173.44 feet; run thence North 20 degrees 02
minutes 55 seconds West a distance of 300.00 feet to a point on the
southerly right of way line of U.S. Highway 80; run thence along said
southerly right of way line North 69 degrees 57 minutes 04 seconds East
a distance of 150.00 feet; thence leaving said southerly right of way line
run South 20 degrees 02 minutes 55 seconds East a distance of 300.00
feet; run thence North 69 degrees 57 minutes 04 seconds East a distance
of 688.75 feet; run thence North 20 degrees 02 minutes 55 seconds West
a distance of 340.00 feet to a point on the southerly right of way line of
U.S. Highway 80; run thence along said southerly right of way line North
69 degrees 57 minutes 04 seconds East a distance of 165.00 feet; thence
leaving said southerly right of way line run South 20 degrees 02 minutes
55 seconds East a distance of 1933.05 feet to a point on the northerly
right of way line of Interstate 20; run thence along said northerly right
of way line South 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds West a distance of
805.00 feet; thence leaving said northerly right of way line run North 00
degrees 30 minutes 59 seconds East a distance of 122.37 feet; run thence
South 65 degrees 34 minutes 51 seconds West a distance of 570.64 feet;
run thence North 73 degrees 59 minutes 51 seconds West a distance of
469.26 feet; run thence South 00 degrees 30 minutes 09 seconds West a
distance of 291.42 feet to a point on the northerly right of way line of
Interstate 20; run thence along said northerly right of way line South 74
degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds West a distance of 1010.40 feet to the
point of beginning of tract, containing 70.115 acres, more or less, and
Page 12 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
being the same property described in that certain Cash Sale Deed dated
May 25, 2001, by and between JPIL Beaird Partnership, et al, as
Vendor, and The State of Louisiana, as Vendee, being recorded on May
31, 2001 in Conveyance Book 1235, Page 585, of the records of the Clerk
of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(10) A tract of land located in Section 18 and 19, Township 18 North,
Range 12 West, Bossier City, Bossier Parish, Louisiana, being more fully
described as follows: Beginning at the Southwest corner of said Section
19, run thence North 00 degrees 28 minutes 08 seconds East a distance
of 2766.05 feet; run thence South 89 degrees 31 minutes 52 seconds East
a distance of 181.00 feet to a point located on the northerly right of way
line of Interstate 20; Thence leaving said northerly right of way line run
North 00 degrees 28 minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 783.42 feet;
run thence North 69 degrees 59 minutes 16 seconds East a distance of
1,365.87 feet; run thence North 20 degrees 00 minutes 17 seconds West
a distance of 692.19 feet; run thence North 69 degrees 57 minutes 04
seconds East a distance of 173.44 feet; run thence North 20 degrees 02
minutes 55 seconds West a distance of 300.00 feet to a point on the
southerly right of way of line of U.S. Highway 80; run thence along said
southerly right of way line North 69 degrees 57 minutes 04 seconds East
a distance of l50.00 feet to the point of beginning of tract herein
described, continue along said southerly right of way line North 69
degrees 57 minutes 04 seconds East a distance of 688.75 feet, thence
leaving said southerly right of way line run south 20 degrees 02 minutes
55 seconds East a distance of 300.00 feet, run thence South 69 degrees 57
minutes 04 seconds West a distance of 688.75 feet, run, thence North 20
degrees 02 minutes 55 seconds West a distance of 300.00 feet to the point
of beginning of tract, containing 4.743 acres, more or less, all as further
shown hereon, and being subject to any and all servitudes, easements,
and/or rights of way of record or of use. Said property having such
Page 13 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
shape, measurements, form dimensions and boundaries as are shown on
a plat of survey prepared by Charles G. Coyle, dated January 31, 2007,
which survey is made a part hereof by reference thereto, and being the
same property described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated March
16, 2007, by and between JPIL Partnership, et al, as Vendor, and The
State of Louisiana, as Vendee, being recorded at Conveyance Book 1400,
Page 552, of the records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(11) Being described as a 64.058 acre, more or less, tract of land in
Sections 18 and 19, Township 18 North, Range 12 West, Bossier Parish,
Louisiana, and more particularly described as follows: Commence at the
Southwest corner of said Section 19 which is monumented with a 2" iron
pipe; thence proceed North 00 degrees 28 minutes 08 seconds East along
the west line of said Section 19 for a distance of 2713.13 feet; thence
proceed North 74 degrees 10 minutes 21 seconds East for a distance of
3014.12 feet to the northerly right of way line of Interstate No. 20 and
the Point of Beginning of the tract herein described which is
monumented with a iron pipe; thence proceed North 20 degrees 02
minutes 55 seconds West for a distance of 1933.06 feet to the southerly
right of way line of U.S. Highway No. 80 and a 2" iron pipe; thence
proceed North 69 degrees 54 minutes 50 seconds East along said right of
way line for a distance of 1315.80 feet to a 5/8" iron rod; thence proceed
North 78 degrees 26 minutes 50 seconds East along said right of way line
for a distance of 101.12 feet to a 5/8" iron rod; thence proceed North 69
degrees 54 minutes 50 seconds East along said right of way line for a
distance of 181.24 feet to the centerline of Flat River; thence proceed
South 09 degrees 10 minutes 18 seconds West along said centerline for
a distance of 264.94 feet; thence proceed South 04 degrees 05 minutes 10
seconds East along said centerline for a distance of 201.55 feet; thence
proceed South 14 degrees 07 minutes I5 seconds East along said
centerline for a distance of 193.97 feet; thence proceed South 17 degrees
Page 14 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
30 minutes 39 seconds East along said centerline for a distance of 295.15
feet; thence proceed South 37 degrees 06 minutes 03 seconds East along
said centerline for a distance of 319.82 feet; thence proceed South 12
degrees 06 minutes 25 seconds East along said centerline for a distance
of 373.42 feet; thence proceed South I2 degrees 16 minutes 41 seconds
West along said centerline for a distance of 120.54 feet; thence proceed
South 12 degrees`31 minutes 12 seconds West along said centerline for
a distance of 372.80 feet to the northerly right of way line of said
Interstate No. 20; thence proceed South 74 degrees 10 minutes 21
seconds West along said northerly right of way line for a distance of
1159.37 feet to the Point of Beginning of the tract herein described,
containing 64.058 acres, more or less, and being the same property
described in that certain Cash Sale Deed, dated December 17, 2007, by
and between JPIL Beaird Partnership, et al, as Vendor, and The City of
Bossier City, et al, as Vendee, being recorded at Conveyance Book 1425,
Page 554, of the records of the Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
(12) The following tracts of land:
TRACT 1
A certain tract of land containing 22.510 acres, more or less, located in
Section 19, Township 18 North, Range 12 West of the Louisiana Prime
Meridian, Northwestern Land District, in the City of Bossier City,
Bossier Parish, Louisiana, being more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the southwest corner of said Section 19 and proceed
North 00° 30' 24" East along the west line of said Section 19 a distance
of 2,766.05 feet; thence proceed South 89° 29' 36" East a distance of
181.00 feet to the southwest corner of a 70.115 acre tract of land
described in Conveyance Book 1235, Page 585 of the records of Bossier
Parish, Louisiana; thence proceed North 00° 30' 24" East along the west
line of said tract a distance of 783.42 feet to a found ½" iron pipe and the
POINT OF BEGINNING; thence leaving said tract continue North 00°
Page 15 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
30' 24" East a distance of 640.82 feet to the southwest corner of a 4.0
acre tract described in Conveyance Book 387, Page 583 of the records of
Bossier Parish, Louisiana; thence proceed North 70'01` 54" East a
distance of 693.59 feet to a found ½" rebar at the southeast corner of
said 4.0 acre tract; thence proceed North 20° 14' 17" West a distance of
391.25 feet to a found ½" iron pipe at the northeast corner of said tract,
said point lying on the south right of way of US Highway 80, as recorded
in Conveyance Book 252, Page 24 of the records of Bossier Parish,
Louisiana; thence proceed North 69° 56' 18" East along said south right
of way a distance of 623.06 feet to a set ½" iron pipe at the intersection
of said south right of way with the west line of said 70.115 acre tract;
thence proceed South 20° 03' 42" East along said 70.115 acre tract a
distance of 300.00 feet to a found ½" iron pipe; thence proceed South 69°
56' 18" West along said 70.115 acre tract a distance of 173.44 feet to a
found ½" iron pipe; thence proceed South 19° 57' 22" East along said
70.115 acre tract a distance of 692.19 feet to a set ½" iron pipe; thence
proceed South 70° 01' 35" West along said 70.115 acre tract a distance
of 1365.87 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING;
And
TRACT 2
A certain tract of land containing 1.552 acres, more or less, located in
Section 19, Township 18 North, Range 12 West of the Louisiana Prime
Meridian, Northwestern Land District, in the City of Bossier City,
Bossier Parish, Louisiana, being more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at the southwest corner of said Section 19 and proceed
North 00° 30' 24" East along the west line of said Section 19 a distance
of 2,766.05 feet; thence proceed South 89° 29' 36" East a distance of
181.00 feet to the southwest comer of a 70.115 acre tract of land
described in, Conveyance Book 1235, Page 585 of the records of Bossier
Parish, Louisiana; thence proceed North 00° 30' 24" East along the west
Page 16 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
line of said tract a distance of 783.42 feet to a found ½" iron pipe; thence
continue North 00° 30' 24" East a distance of 648.32 feet to a set ½" iron
pipe on the easterly high bank of Alligator Bayou and the POINT OF
BEGINNING; thence continue North 00° 30' 24" East a distance of
409.18 feet (passing a ½" iron pipe set for reference at 148.59 feet) to a
set ½" iron pipe on the south right of way of US Highway 80, as recorded
Conveyance Book 252, Page 24 of the records of Bossier Parish,
Louisiana; thence proceed North 69° 56' 18" East along said right of way
a distance of 225.99 feet to the northwest corner of a 4.0 acre tract
described in Conveyance Book 387, Page 583 of the records of Bossier
Parish, Louisiana; thence proceed along the west side of said 4.0 acre
tract and the easterly high bank of Alligator Bayou, the following three
courses and distances:
South 01° 28' 53" West a distance of 157.10 feet;
South 17° 34' 53" West a distance of 162.80 feet;
South 42° 59' 53" West a distance of 238.51 feet to the POINT OF
BEGINNING,
LESS AND EXCEPT that portion of the 1.552 acres which lies between
the ordinary low water lines of Alligator Bayou, which is subject to claim
by the State of Louisiana, and being the same property described in that
certain Cash Sale Deed, dated May 19, 2023, by and between JPIL
Beaird Partnership, et al, as Vendor, and the State of Louisiana, as
Vendee, being recorded under instrument #1312020 of the records of the
Clerk of Court, Bossier Parish, Louisiana.
Section 2. The Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College and the commissioner of administration are
hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions, and
stipulations and to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any
conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights,
to the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically described in
Page 17 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 229 ENROLLED
any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and between the Board
of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College
and the commissioner of administration in exchange of consideration proportionate to
the appraised value of the property. Any sale conducted pursuant to this Act shall be
in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 41:140(D).
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 18 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.